Utah statutes.
31A-23a-115.5.   Use of customer service representative.

A producer, surplus lines producer, or consultant who employs a customer service representative is responsible for the duties performed by the customer service representative.  A customer service representative:

(1)  may not maintain an office independent of the customer service representative's licensed producer, surplus lines producer, or consultant employer for the purpose of conducting insurance activities;

(2)  except as provided in Subsection (3), may not sell, solicit, negotiate, or bind coverage; and

(3)  may provide a customer a quote on behalf of the customer service representative's licensed producer, surplus lines producer, or consultant employer.



Amended by Chapter 253, 2012 General Session

